Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 9
VEHICLE EQUIPMENT

Sec.

§ 49-901. Duties of department and director of Idaho state police.

The director shall adopt standards and specifications applicable to head lamps, clearance lamps, identification and other lamps on snow removal equipment when operated on the highways in lieu of the lamps otherwise required on vehicles by this title. Standards and specifications may permit the use of flashing lights for purposes of identification on snow removal equipment when in service upon the highways.

The director may adopt standards and specifications applicable to lighting equipment on and special warning devices to be carried by school buses supplemental to but consistent with the provisions of section 49-914 [49-915], Idaho Code. Standards and specifications shall correlate with and so far as possible conform to specifications then current as approved by the society of automotive engineers.

The director is authorized to approve or disapprove lighting devices and to issue and enforce rules establishing standards and specifications for the approval of lighting devices, their installation, adjustment, and aiming, and adjustment when in use on motor vehicles. Regulations shall correlate with and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications of the society of automotive engineers applicable to that equipment.

The director shall approve or disapprove any lighting device, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this title, within a reasonable time after the device has been submitted. He is authorized to set up the procedure which shall be followed when any device is submitted for approval, and upon approving any lamp or device shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval together with any instructions determined by him. The department shall publish lists of all lamps and devices by name and type which have been approved. Any person desiring approval of a device shall notify the director in writing of the person’s intention and shall submit the device for testing and approval as directed by the director. The director shall not approve a lighting device on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle that does not have a self-recovery lighting system such as a generator or alternator to replace the power supply.

The director shall approve and disapprove warning lighting devices on emergency and police vehicles and establish standards and specifications for emergency warning lighting devices.

When the department has reason to believe that an approved device as being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this title, the director may, after giving thirty (30) days’ previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the approved device. After the hearing he shall determine whether the approved device meets the requirements of this title. If the device does not meet the requirements of this title, he shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state.

If at the expiration of ninety (90) days after the notice, the person holding the certificate of approval for the device has failed to satisfy the department that the approved device as thereafter to be sold meets the requirements of this title, the director shall suspend or revoke the approval issued until or unless the device is resubmitted to and retested by an approved testing agency and found to meet the requirements of this title, and may require that all the devices sold since the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this title. The department may at the time of the retest, purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of the approved devices, and if the device upon retest fails to meet the requirements of this title, the director may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of the device.
(7) The director shall adopt and enforce safety requirements, rules and specifications applicable to air conditioning equipment which shall correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the current recommended practice or standard applicable to air conditioning equipment approved by the society of automotive engineers.

(8) The director in cooperation with the state board of education shall adopt and enforce rules not inconsistent with this title to govern the design and operation of all school buses when owned and operated by any school district or privately owned and operated under contract with any school district in the state, and these rules shall by reference be made a part of any contract with a school district. Every school district, its officers and employees, and every person employed under contract by a school district shall be subject to these rules.

§ 49-901A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-901B. Compliance with the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1956. [Repealed.]

§ 49-902. Scope and effect.

It shall be unlawful for any person to drive, or move, or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in an unsafe condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with the lamps and other requirements in proper condition and adjustment, as required by the provisions of this chapter, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing contained in the provisions of this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter, with respect to equipment on vehicles, shall not apply to implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, farm tractors or slow moving vehicles except as otherwise specifically made applicable.

§ 49-903. When lighted lamps are required.

Every vehicle upon a highway at any time from sunset to sunrise and at any other time when there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of five hundred (500) feet ahead shall display lighted lamps and illuminating devices as here respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles as stated herein.

§ 49-904. Visibility distance and mounted height of lamps.

Whenever a requirement is stated as to the distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible, or within which lamps or devices shall be visible, those provisions shall apply during the times stated in section 49-903, Idaho Code, in respect to a vehicle without load when upon a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

Whenever a requirement is stated as to the mounted height of lamps or devices, it shall mean from the center of the lamp or device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when the vehicle is without a load.

§ 49-905. Head lamps on motor vehicles.

Every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with at least two (2) head lamps with at least one (1) on each side of the front of the motor vehicle. The head lamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter.

Every motorcycle and every motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with at least one (1) and not more than two (2) head lamps which shall comply with the requirements and limitations of this chapter.

Every head lamp upon every motor vehicle, including every motorcycle and motor-driven cycle, shall be located at a height measured from the center of the head lamp of not more than fifty-four (54) inches nor less than twenty-four (24) inches to be measured as set forth in section 49-904(2), Idaho Code.

No person shall operate any motor vehicle on the highways with head lamps which are composed of, covered by, or treated with any material, substance, system, or component which, when such head lamps are not in operation, is highly reflective or otherwise opaque and nontransparent.

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale any motor vehicles with head lamps that are in violation of the provisions of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to make illegal the operation or sale of any motor vehicle, the head lamps of which are composed of, covered by, or treated with any material, substance, system, or component with which the motor vehicle was sold when new or could have been equipped for sale when new as standard or optional equipment under any United States government statute or regulation governing the sale at the time of manufacture.

Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of an infraction.

§ 49-906. Tail lamps.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer, and any other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles, shall be equipped with at least one (1) tail lamp mounted on the rear, which when lighted as required, shall emit a red light plainly visible from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the rear. In the case of a train of vehicles only the tail lamp on the rearmost vehicle need actually be seen from the distance specified. Every mentioned vehicle, other than a truck tractor, registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after December 31, 1955, shall be equipped with at least two (2) tail lamps mounted on the rear, which when lighted as required, shall comply with the provisions of this section.

Every tail lamp upon every vehicle shall be located at a height of not more than seventy-two (72) inches nor less than twenty (20) inches.

Any tail lamp shall be wired so to be lighted whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted.

Nothing herein shall prohibit the display on any vehicle thirty (30) years or older of tail lamps containing a blue or purple insert lens not to exceed one (1) inch in diameter, provided the tail lamp or lamps otherwise comply with the requirements of this section.

§ 49-907. Motor vehicles to be equipped with reflectors.

Every motor vehicle sold and operated upon a highway, other than a truck tractor, shall carry on the rear, either as a part of the tail lamps or separately, two (2) red reflectors. Every motorcycle and every motor-driven cycle shall carry at least one (1) reflector meeting the requirements of this section. Vehicles of the type mentioned in section 49-909, Idaho Code, shall be equipped with reflectors as required in the applicable subsections.

Except as otherwise provided, every reflector shall be mounted on the vehicle at a height of not less than twenty (20) inches nor more than sixty (60) inches measured as set forth in section 49-904(2), Idaho Code, and shall be of a size and characteristic and mounted so to be visible at night from all distances within three hundred fifty (350) feet to one hundred (100) feet from the vehicle when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps.

§ 49-908. Stop lamps and turn signals required on motor vehicles.

After December 31, 1986, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell any motor vehicle, including any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, in this state or for any person to drive a vehicle on the highways unless it is equipped with at least one (1) stop lamp meeting the requirements of section 49-919, Idaho Code.

No person shall sell or offer for sale or operate on the highways any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after December 31, 1954, unless it is equipped with mechanical or electrical turn signals meeting the requirements of section 49-918 [49-919], Idaho Code. This subsection shall not apply to a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle.

§ 49-909. Additional equipment required on certain vehicles.

In addition to other equipment required in this chapter, the following vehicles shall be equipped as follows:

On every bus or truck, whatever its size, there shall be:

On each side, one (1) reflector, at or near the rear; and

On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one (1) at each side, and one (1) stoplight.

On every bus or truck eighty (80) inches or more in over-all width and less than thirty (30) feet in over-all length, in addition to the requirements in subsection (1):

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side; and

On the rear, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side.

On every bus or truck thirty (30) feet or more in over-all length, regardless of its width, in addition to the requirements in subsection (1), clearance lamps required in subsection (2), plus:

On each side, two (2) side marker lamps, one (1) at or near the front and one (1) at or near the rear; and

On each side, one (1) reflector at or near the front.

On every truck tractor, the cab of which is as wide as or wider than any vehicle being drawn:

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side; and

On each side, one (1) side marker lamp at or near the front.

On every trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight in excess of three thousand (3,000) pounds, if wider than the truck or the cab of the truck tractor drawing it, the following:

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side;

On each side, two (2) side marker lamps, one (1) at or near the front and one (1) at or near the rear;

On each side, two (2) reflectors, one (1) at or near the front and one (1) at or near the rear; and

On the rear, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side, also two (2) reflectors, one (1) at each side, and one (1) stoplight.

On every trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight in excess of three thousand (3,000) pounds if of the same width or less than the truck or the cab of the truck drawing it, the following:

On each side, one (1) side marker lamp near the rear;

On each side, two (2) reflectors, one (1) at or near the front and one (1) at or near the rear;

On the rear, two (2) clearance lamps, one (1) at each side; and

On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one (1) at each side and one (1) stoplight.

On every pole trailer in excess of three thousand (3,000) pounds gross weight:

On each side, one (1) side marker lamp and one (1) clearance lamp which may be in combination, to show the front, side and rear; and

On the rear of the pole trailer or load, two (2) reflectors, one (1) at each side.

On every trailer, semitrailer and pole trailer weighing three thousand (3,000) pounds gross or less:
(a) On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one (1) on each side; and

If any trailer or semitrailer is so loaded or is of dimensions which obscure the stoplight on the towing vehicle, then the drawn vehicle shall also be equipped with one (1) stoplight.

Reflectors shall be mounted at a height no less than twenty-four (24) inches and not higher than sixty (60) inches above the ground on which the vehicle stands. If the highest part of the permanent structure of the vehicle is less than twenty-four (24) inches, the reflector at that point shall be mounted as high as that part of the permanent structure will permit. Rear reflectors on a pole trailer may be mounted on each side of the bolster or load. Any required red reflector on the rear of a vehicle may be incorporated with the tail lamp, but the reflector shall meet all the other reflector requirements of this chapter.

Clearance lamps shall be mounted on the permanent structure of the vehicle in a manner to indicate its extreme width and as near the top as practicable. Clearance lamps and side marker lamps may be mounted in combination provided illumination is given as prescribed for both.

Lighting devices required shall be mounted, so far as practicable, in a manner to reduce the hazard of their being obscured by mud or dust thrown by the vehicle’s wheels.

On every trailer where the connecting tongue is fifteen (15) feet or more in length two (2) amber-colored reflectors shall be mounted on the connecting tongue, one (1) on each side near the center of the connecting tongue.

(b) On the front, two (2) reflectors, one (1) on each side.

§ 49-910. Color of clearance lamps, side marker lamps, and reflectors.

Front clearance lamps and marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the front or on the side near the front of a vehicle shall display or reflect an amber color.

Rear clearance lamps and marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the rear or on the sides near the rear of a vehicle shall display or reflect a red color.

All lighting devices and reflectors mounted on the rear of any vehicle shall display or reflect a red color, except the stoplight or other signal device, which may be red, amber, or yellow, and except that the light illuminating the license plate shall be white and the light emitted by a back-up lamp may be white, amber, or red.

§ 49-910A. Color of lamps and globes limited to certain vehicle classes.

For the purposes of this chapter lighting devices utilizing various colors of lighted globes approved by the director of the Idaho state police for use on vehicles shall be restricted to the following class of vehicles:

Police vehicles. Only police vehicles shall display blue lights, lenses or globes.

Designated emergency vehicles. Fire fighting vehicles, vehicles belonging to personnel of voluntary fire departments, vehicles belonging to, or operated by EMS personnel certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS bureau of the Idaho department of health and welfare while in the performance of emergency medical services, ambulances, sheriff’s search and rescue vehicles which are under the immediate supervision of the county sheriff, and wreckers, as defined in section 49-124, Idaho Code, which are engaged in motor vehicle recovery operations and are blocking part or all of one or more lanes of traffic, are designated emergency vehicles. With the exception of school buses as provided in section 49-915, Idaho Code, only fire fighting vehicles, vehicles belonging to personnel of voluntary fire departments, vehicles belonging to, or operated by EMS personnel certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS bureau of the Idaho department of health and welfare while in the performance of emergency medical services, ambulances, designated emergency vehicles described herein, vehicles authorized by the Idaho transportation board for use in the enforcement of vehicle laws specified in section 40-510, Idaho Code, and other emergency vehicles designated by the director of the Idaho state police may display red flashing lights or red lenses or globes which are visible from the front of the vehicle.

All vehicles. Any motor vehicle may have attached to it a flashing amber light to warn motorists of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing the vehicle displaying such lighting. The driver of an approaching vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any stationary vehicle displaying a flashing amber light.

§ 49-911. Visibility of reflectors, clearance lamps, and marker lamps.

Every reflector upon any vehicle referred to in section 49-909, Idaho Code, shall be of a size and characteristic and maintained to be readily visible at nighttime from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to one hundred (100) feet from the vehicle when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps. Reflectors required to be mounted on the sides of the vehicle shall reflect the required color light to the sides, and those mounted on the rear shall reflect a red color to the rear.

Front and rear clearance lamps shall be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred (500) feet from the front and rear, respectively, of the vehicle.

Side marker lamps shall be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred (500) feet from the side of the vehicle on which mounted.

§ 49-912. Obstructed lights not required.

Whenever motor and other vehicles are operated in combination during the time that lights are required, any lamp, except tail lamps, need not be lighted which, by reason of its location on a vehicle of the combination, would be obscured by another vehicle of the combination, but this shall not affect the requirement that lighted clearance lamps be displayed on the front of the foremost vehicles required to have clearance lamps, nor that all lights required on the rear of the rearmost vehicle of any combination shall be lighted.

§ 49-913. Lamp or flag on projecting load.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four (4) feet or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle, there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load, at the times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, a red light or lantern plainly visible from a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet to the sides and rear. The red light or lantern required under this section shall be in addition to the red rear light required upon every vehicle. At any other time there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load a red or fluorescent orange flag a minimum of eighteen (18) inches by eighteen (18) inches and hung so that the flag is visible to the driver of a vehicle approaching from the rear.

§ 49-914. Lamps on parked vehicles.

Whenever a vehicle is lawfully parked upon a highway at the times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, and in the event there is sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of five hundred (500) feet upon the highway, no lights need be displayed upon the parked vehicle.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a highway, whether attended or unattended, at the times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, and there is not sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of five hundred (500) feet upon the highway, the parked or stopped vehicle shall be equipped with one or more lamps meeting the following requirements: at least one (1) lamp shall display a white or amber light visible from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and the same lamp or at least one (1) other lamp shall display a red light visible from the same distance to the rear of the vehicle. The location of the lamp shall always be such that at least one (1) lamp or combination of lamps meeting the requirements of this section is installed as near as practicable to the side of the vehicle which is closest to passing traffic. This provision shall not apply to a motor-driven cycle.

Any lighted head lamps upon a parked vehicle shall be depressed or dimmed.

§ 49-915. School buses — Visual signal.

Every school bus shall, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this title, be equipped with signal lamps mounted as high and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, which shall display to the front two (2) alternately flashing red lights located at the same level and to the rear two (2) alternately flashing red lights located at the same level. These lights shall be visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal sunlight.

Any school bus shall, in addition to the lights required by subsection (1), be equipped with yellow signal lamps mounted near each of the four (4) red lamps and at the same level, but closer to the vertical centerline of the bus, which shall display two (2) alternately flashing yellow lights to the front and two (2) alternately flashing yellow lights to the rear. These lights shall be visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal sunlight. These lights shall be displayed by the school bus driver at least two hundred (200) feet before every stop at which the alternately flashing red lights required by subsection (1) will be actuated.

Every school bus shall be equipped with a semaphore stop arm which shall be a flat eighteen (18) inch octagon exclusive of brackets for mounting, with reflectorized material on both sides, be red with a silver white border, and have a legend reading “stop” six (6) inches high with three-quarter (¾) inch wide silver white letters, mounted outside the bus on the left side opposite driver’s seat and have a driver-controlled mechanism. Flashing lamps in the stop arm may be connected to the alternating red flashing signal lamp circuits. The stop arm signal may be vacuum, electric, air or manually controlled.

§ 49-916. Lamps on farm tractors, farm equipment and implements of husbandry.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled farm equipment unit or implement of husbandry not equipped with an electric lighting system shall at all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, be equipped with at least one (1) lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle and shall also be equipped with at least one (1) lamp displaying a red light visible from at least the same distance to the rear of the vehicle, and two (2) red reflectors visible from a distance of one hundred (100) to six hundred (600) feet to the rear when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps. Lights required in this section shall be positioned so that one (1) lamp showing to the front and one (1) lamp or reflector showing to the rear will indicate the further projection of the tractor, unit or implement on the side of the road used in passing the vehicle.

Every combination of farm tractor and towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry not equipped with an electric lighting system shall at all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, be equipped with the following:

At least one (1) lamp mounted to indicate as nearly as practicable the extreme left projection of the combination and displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the front of the combination;

Two (2) red reflectors visible from a distance of one hundred (100) to six hundred (600) feet to the rear of the combination when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps. The reflectors shall be mounted in a manner to indicate as nearly as practicable the extreme left and right rear projections of the towed unit or implement on the highway.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry equipped with an electric lighting system shall at all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, be equipped with two (2) single-beam or multiple-beam head lamps meeting the requirements of sections 49-922 or 49-924, Idaho Code, respectively or, as an alternative, section 49-926, Idaho Code, and two (2) red lamps visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the rear, or in the alternative, one (1) red lamp visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the rear and two (2) red reflectors visible from a distance of one hundred (100) to six hundred (600) feet to the rear when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps. Red lamps or reflectors shall be mounted in the rear of the farm tractor or self-propelled implement of husbandry to indicate as nearly as practicable the extreme left and right projections of the vehicle on the highway.

The farm tractor element of every combination of farm tractor and towed farm equipment or towed implement of husbandry equipped with an electric lighting system shall at all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, be equipped with two (2) single-beam or multiple-beam head lamps meeting the requirements of sections 49-922, 49-924, or 49-926, Idaho Code.

§ 49-917. Lamps on other vehicles and equipment.

Every vehicle, including animal-drawn vehicles and other vehicles not specifically required by the provisions of this chapter to be equipped with lamps or other lighting devices, shall at all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, be equipped with at least one (1) lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and shall also be equipped with two (2) lamps displaying a red light visible from the same distance to the rear of the vehicle, or as an alternative, one (1) lamp displaying a red light visible from the same distance to the rear and two (2) red reflectors visible for distances of one hundred (100) to six hundred (600) feet to the rear when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps.

§ 49-918. Spot lamps and auxiliary lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) spot lamps, and each lighted spot lamp shall be so aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will be directed to the left of the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle nor more than one hundred (100) feet ahead of the vehicle.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) fog lamps mounted on the front, at a height not less than twelve (12) inches nor more than thirty (30) inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands, and so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light to the left of the center of the vehicle shall at a distance of twenty-five (25) feet ahead project higher than a level of four (4) inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes. Lighted fog lamps meeting these requirements may be used with lower head lamp beams as specified in section 49-922(2), Idaho Code.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) auxiliary passing lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than twenty-four (24) inches nor more than forty-two (42) inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 49-922, Idaho Code, shall apply to any combination of head lamps and auxiliary passing lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than sixteen (16) inches nor more than forty-two (42) inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 49-922, Idaho Code, shall apply to any combination of head lamps and auxiliary driving lamps.

§ 49-919. Signal lamps and signal devices.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped and when required under this chapter shall be equipped with stop lamps on the rear of the vehicle which shall display a red or amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred (100) feet to the rear in normal sunlight, and which shall be actuated upon application of the service (foot) brake, and which may but need not, be incorporated with one or more other rear lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped and when required under this chapter shall be equipped with lamps or mechanical signal devices showing to the front and rear for the purposes of indicating an intention to turn either to the right or left. When lamps are used for this purpose, the lamps showing to the front shall be located on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and when in use shall display a white or amber light, or any shade of color between white and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred (100) feet to the front in normal sunlight, and the lamps showing to the rear shall be located at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and when in use shall display a red or amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred (100) feet to the rear in normal sunlight. When actuated the lamps shall indicate the intended direction of turning by flashing the lights showing to the front and rear on the side toward which the turn is made. Where mechanical signal devices are used for this purpose, the devices shall be self-illuminated when in use at the times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code.

No stop lamp or signal lamp or device shall project a glaring light.

§ 49-920. Additional lighting equipment.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) side cowl or fender lamps which shall emit an amber or white light without glare.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than one (1) running-board courtesy lamp on each side which shall emit a white or amber light without glare.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) back-up lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps, but any back-up lamp shall not be lighted when the motor vehicle is in forward motion.

Any vehicle may be equipped with lamps which may be used for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing, and when so equipped may display that warning in addition to any other warning signals required by this title. Lamps used to display the warning to the front shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall display simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, or any shade or color between white and amber. The lamps used to display the warning to the rear shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. These warning lights shall be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet under normal atmospheric conditions at night.

Any commercial vehicle eighty (80) inches or more in overall width may be equipped with not more than three (3) identification lamps showing to the front which shall emit an amber light without glare, and not more than three (3) identification lamps showing to the rear which shall emit a red light without glare. These lamps shall be placed in a row and may be mounted either horizontally or vertically.

§ 49-921. Rear mounted acceleration and deceleration lighting system.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, truck tractor, and pole trailer used in the state may be equipped with an auxiliary lighting system consisting of:

One (1) green light to be activated when the accelerator of the motor vehicle is depressed;

Not more than two (2) amber lights to be activated when the motor vehicle is moving forward, or standing and idling, but is not under the power of the engine.

An auxiliary system shall not interfere with the operation of vehicle tail lamps and shall not interfere with the operation of vehicle signal lamps and signal devices. The system may operate in conjunction with tail lamps or signal lamps and signal devices.

Only one (1) color of the system may be illuminated at any one (1) time, and at all times either the green light, or amber light or lights shall be illuminated when the tail lamps of the vehicle are not illuminated.

The green light and the amber light or lights, when illuminated, shall be plainly visible at a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the rear.

Only one (1) system may be mounted on a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, truck tractor, or pole trailer; and the system shall be rear mounted in a horizontal fashion, at a height of not more than seventy-two (72) inches, nor less than twenty (20) inches.

On a combination of vehicles, only the lights of the rearmost vehicle need actually be seen and distinguished as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Each manufacturer’s model of such a system described in this section shall be approved by the board before it may be sold or offered for sale in the state.

§ 49-922. Multiple-beam road-lighting equipment.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the head lamps or the auxiliary driving lamp or the auxiliary passing lamp or their combinations on motor vehicles other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be so arranged that selection may be made between distributions of light projected to different elevations, and the lamps may be so arranged that the selection can be made automatically, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

There shall be an uppermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of an intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least three hundred fifty (350) feet ahead for all conditions of loading.

There shall be a lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one hundred (100) feet ahead. On a straight level road under any condition of loading none of the high-intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

Every motor vehicle manufactured after December 31, 1954, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, which has multiple-beam road-lighting equipment shall be equipped with a beam indicator, which shall be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the head lamps is in use, and shall not otherwise be lighted. The indicator shall be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of the vehicle so equipped.

§ 49-923. Use of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a highway during the times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle.

Whenever a driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred (500) feet, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam, shall be deemed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within two hundred (200) feet to the rear, except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, the driver shall use a distribution of light permissible under this chapter other than the uppermost distribution of light specified in section 49-922, Idaho Code.

§ 49-924. Single-beam road-lighting equipment.

Head lamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light shall be permitted on motor vehicles manufactured prior to January 1, 1955, in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment specified in this chapter if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The head lamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded, none of the high-intensity portion of the light shall at a distance of twenty-five (25) feet ahead project higher than a level of five (5) inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes, and in no case higher than forty-two (42) inches above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five (75) feet ahead.

The intensity shall be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet.